North Carolina statutes. Chapter 15. Criminal Procedure.
Article 20. Suspension of Sentence and Probation.

§§ 15-197 through 15-200.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 711, s. 33.

Cross References.

For provisions as to post-trial relief, see

G.S. 15A-1411

et seq.

§ 15-200.2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1975, c. 309, s. 2.

Cross References.

For provisions as to post-trial relief, see

G.S. 15A-1411

et seq.

§§ 15-201,
15-202.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1262, s. 10.

Cross References.

As to transfer of the functions of the State Probation Commission to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, see G.S. 143B-704.

§ 15-203.
Duties of the Secretary of Public Safety; appointment of probation officers; reports; requests for extradition.

The Secretary of Public Safety, or the Secretary’s designee, shall direct the work of the probation officers appointed under this Article. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Secretary of Public Safety shall have sole discretion to establish the minimum experience requirements to receive an appointment as a probation officer. The Office of State Human Resources shall work with the Secretary to establish position classifications for probation officers based on the experience requirements established by the Secretary. The Secretary, or the Secretary’s designee, shall consult and cooperate with the courts and institutions in the development of methods and procedure in the administration of probation, and shall arrange conferences of probation officers and judges. The Secretary shall make an annual written report with statistical and other information to the Governor. The Secretary is authorized to present to the Governor written applications for requisitions for the return of probationers who have broken the terms of their probation, and are believed to be in another state, and the Secretary shall follow the procedure outlined for requests for extradition as set forth in

G.S. 15A-743

.

History.

1937, c. 132, s. 7; 1959, c. 127; 1963, c. 914, s. 2; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 2010-96, s. 2; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2012-83, s. 2; 2013-382, s. 9.1(c).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2010-96, s. 2, effective July 20, 2010, throughout the section, substituted “The Secretary” for “He,” or similar language; and substituted “G.S. 15A-743” for “G.S. 15-77” at the end.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(h) and (i), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety” for “Department of Correction” and substituted “Secretary of Public Safety” for “Secretary of Correction” throughout the section.

Session Laws 2012-83, s. 2, effective June 26, 2012, in the first and fourth sentences, substituted “Safety, or the Secretary’s designee,” for “Safety”; added the second and third sentences; and in the fifth sentence, deleted “the Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety and” preceding “the Governor.”

Session Laws 2013-382, s. 9.1(c), effective August 21, 2013, substituted “Office of State Human Resources” for “Office of State Personnel.”

§ 15-203.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1963, c. 914, s. 6.

Cross References.

For duties of the Secretary of Public Safety, see

G.S. 15-203

.

§ 15-204.
Assignment, compensation and oath of probation officers.

Probation officers appointed under this Article shall be assigned to serve in such courts or districts or otherwise as the Secretary of Public Safety may determine. They shall be paid annual salaries to be fixed by the Department of Public Safety, and shall also be paid traveling and other necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties as probation officers when such expense accounts have been authorized and approved by the Secretary of Public Safety.

Each person appointed as a probation officer shall take an oath of office before the judge of the court or courts in which he is to serve, which oath shall be as follows:

“I, , do solemnly and sincerely swear that I will be faithful and bear true allegiance to the State of North Carolina, and to the constitutional powers and authorities which are or may be established for the government thereof; and that I will endeavor to support, maintain, and defend the Constitution of said State, not inconsistent with the Constitution of the United States, to the best of my knowledge and ability; so help me God,” and shall be noted of record by the clerk of the court.

Click to view

History.

1937, c. 132, s. 8; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2012-83, s. 23.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(h) and (i), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety” for “Department of Correction” and substituted “Secretary of Public Safety” for “Secretary of Correction” throughout the section.

Session Laws 2012-83, s. 23, effective June 26, 2012, deleted “the Division of Adult Correction of” preceding “the Department of Public Safety”in the second sentence of the first paragraph.

§ 15-205.
Duties and powers of the probation officers.

A probation officer shall investigate all cases referred to him for investigation by the judges of the courts or by the Secretary of Public Safety. Such officer shall keep informed concerning the conduct and condition of each person on probation under his supervision by visiting, requiring reports, and in other ways, and shall report thereon in writing as often as the court or the Secretary of Public Safety may require. Such officer shall use all practicable and suitable methods, not inconsistent with the conditions imposed by the court or the Secretary of Public Safety, to aid and encourage persons on probation to bring about improvement in their conduct and condition. Such officer shall keep detailed records of his work; shall make such reports in writing to the Secretary of Public Safety as he may require; and shall perform such other duties as the Secretary of Public Safety may require. A probation officer shall have, in the execution of his duties, the powers of arrest and, to the extent necessary for the performance of his duties, the same right to execute process as is now given, or that may hereafter be given by law, to the sheriffs of this State.

History.

1937, c. 132, s. 9; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 1975, c. 229, s. 1; 1977, c. 711, s. 18; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2013-101, s. 3.

§ 15-205.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 711, s. 33.

Cross References.

For provisions as to post-trial relief, see

G.S. 15A-1411

et seq.

§ 15-206.
Cooperation with Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety and officials of local units. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

It is hereby made the duty of every city, county, or State official or department to render all assistance and cooperation within the official’s or the Department’s fundamental power which may further the objects of this Article. The Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, the Secretary of Public Safety, and the probation officers are authorized to seek the cooperation of such officials and departments, and especially of the county superintendents of social services and of the Department of Health and Human Services.

History.

1937, c. 132, s. 10; 1961, c. 139, s. 2; 1969, c. 982; 1973, c. 476, s. 138; c. 1262, s. 10; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 2011-145, ss. 19.1(h), (i); 2012-83, s. 24; 2017-186, s. 2(oo).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered G.A. 15-206.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendment to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o) and (t), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(h) and (i), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety” for “Department of Correction” and substituted “Secretary of Public Safety” for “Secretary of Correction” throughout this section.

Session Laws 2012-83, s. 24, effective June 26, 2012, deleted the first paragraph which read: “It shall be the duty of the Secretary of Public Safety and the Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety to cooperate with each other to the end that the purposes of probation and parole may be more effectively carried out. When requested, each shall make available to the other case records in his possession, and in cases of emergency, where time and expense can be saved, shall provide investigation service.”; and in the second paragraph, in the first sentence, substituted “the official’s or the Department’s” for “his or its” and in the second sentence, deleted “State” preceding “Division of Adult Correction.”

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(oo), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in the section heading and in the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, ss. 19C.9(o) and 19C.9(t), in the second sentence, substituted “Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Secretary of Public Safety.” For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 15-206.
Cooperation with Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction and officials of local units. [Effective January 1, 2023]

It is hereby made the duty of every city, county, or State official or department to render all assistance and cooperation within the official’s or the Department’s fundamental power which may further the objects of this Article. The Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction, the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction, and the probation officers are authorized to seek the cooperation of such officials and departments, and especially of the county superintendents of social services and of the Department of Health and Human Services.

History.

1937, c. 132, s. 10; 1961, c. 139, s. 2; 1969, c. 982; 1973, c. 476, s. 138; c. 1262, s. 10; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 2011-145, ss. 19.1(h), (i); 2012-83, s. 24; 2017-186, s. 2(oo); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (t).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered G.A. 15-206.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the main volume.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendment to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o) and (t), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(h) and (i), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety” for “Department of Correction” and substituted “Secretary of Public Safety” for “Secretary of Correction” throughout this section.

Session Laws 2012-83, s. 24, effective June 26, 2012, deleted the first paragraph which read: “It shall be the duty of the Secretary of Public Safety and the Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety to cooperate with each other to the end that the purposes of probation and parole may be more effectively carried out. When requested, each shall make available to the other case records in his possession, and in cases of emergency, where time and expense can be saved, shall provide investigation service.”; and in the second paragraph, in the first sentence, substituted “the official’s or the Department’s” for “his or its” and in the second sentence, deleted “State” preceding “Division of Adult Correction.”

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(oo), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in the section heading and in the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, ss. 19C.9(o) and 19C.9(t), in the second sentence, substituted “Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Secretary of Public Safety.” For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 15-207.
Records treated as privileged information.

All information and data obtained in the discharge of official duty by any probation officer shall be privileged information, shall not be receivable as evidence in any court, and shall not be disclosed directly or indirectly to any other than the judge or to others entitled under this Article to receive reports, unless and until otherwise ordered by a judge of the court or the Secretary of Public Safety.

History.

1937, c. 132, s. 11; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 2011-145, s. 19.1(i).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(i), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Secretary of Public Safety” for “Secretary of Correction.”

§ 15-208.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1975, c. 138.

§ 15-209.
Accommodations for probation offices. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The county commissioners in each county in which a probation office exists shall provide, in or near the courthouse, suitable office space for those probation officers assigned to the county who have probationary caseloads and their administrative support. This requirement does not include management staff of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, nonprobation staff, or other Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety employees.

If a county is unable to provide the space required under subsection (a) of this section for any reason, it may elect to request that the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety lease space for the probation office and receive reimbursement from the county for the leased space. If a county fails to reimburse the Division for such leased space, the Secretary of Public Safety may request that the Administrative Office of the Courts transfer the unpaid amount to the Division from the county’s court and jail facility fee remittances.

History.

1937, c. 132, s. 13; 2009-451, s. 19.19; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2017-186, s. 2(pp).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered G.S. 15.209.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendment to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(t), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-451, s. 19.19, effective July 1, 2009, substituted “offices” for “officers” in the section heading; designated the previously existing provisions as subsection (a); in subsection (a), in the first sentence, substituted “office exists” for “officer serves” near the middle, and “those probation officers assigned to the county who have probationary caseloads and their administrative support” for “such officer” at the end, and added the last sentence; and added subsection (b).

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(h) and (i), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety” for “Department of Correction,” “Division” for “Department” and “Secretary of Public Safety” for “Secretary of Correction” throughout the section.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(pp), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” following “Division of Adult Correction” throughout the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(t), substituted “Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” throughout this section. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 15-209.
Accommodations for probation offices. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The county commissioners in each county in which a probation office exists shall provide, in or near the courthouse, suitable office space for those probation officers assigned to the county who have probationary caseloads and their administrative support. This requirement does not include management staff of the Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction, nonprobation staff, or other Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction employees.

If a county is unable to provide the space required under subsection (a) of this section for any reason, it may elect to request that the Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction lease space for the probation office and receive reimbursement from the county for the leased space. If a county fails to reimburse the Division for such leased space, the Secretary of Public Safety may request that the Administrative Office of the Courts transfer the unpaid amount to the Division from the county’s court and jail facility fee remittances.

History.

1937, c. 132, s. 13; 2009-451, s. 19.19; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2017-186, s. 2(pp); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(t).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered G.S. 15.209.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the main volume.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), effective January 1, 2023, lists sections throughout the North Carolina General Statutes in which “Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction” is substituted for “Secretary of Public Safety.” However, the reference to “Secretary of Public Safety” in the last sentence of subsection (b) was not among the provisions identified in s. 19C.9(o) for substitution. Therefore, the reference to “Secretary of Public Safety” in subsection (b) remains unaffected by the amendment.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendment to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(t), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-451, s. 19.19, effective July 1, 2009, substituted “offices” for “officers” in the section heading; designated the previously existing provisions as subsection (a); in subsection (a), in the first sentence, substituted “office exists” for “officer serves” near the middle, and “those probation officers assigned to the county who have probationary caseloads and their administrative support” for “such officer” at the end, and added the last sentence; and added subsection (b).

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(h) and (i), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety” for “Department of Correction,” “Division” for “Department” and “Secretary of Public Safety” for “Secretary of Correction” throughout the section.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(pp), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” following “Division of Adult Correction” throughout the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(t), substituted “Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” throughout this section. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.